Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,104
Evidence as to laws of other jurisdictions.

Any party may also present to the trial court any admissible evidence of such laws, but, to enable a party to offer evidence of the law in another jurisdiction or to ask that judicial notice be taken thereof, reasonable notice shall be given to the adverse parties either in the pleadings or otherwise.

Laws 1947, c. 93, § 4, p. 273.

In order for litigant to invoke Uniform Judicial Notice of Foreign Law Act, he must give reasonable notice in pleadings or otherwise of intention so to do. Smith v. Brooks, 154 Neb. 93, 47 N.W.2d 389 (1951).

To require trial court to take judicial notice of law of another state, it must be pleaded. Scott v. Scott, 153 Neb. 906, 46 N.W.2d 627 (1951).